Washington statutes.
RCW 41.05.890

Certain health care and financial related data provided to authority—Exempt from disclosure.

(1) All health care and financial related data as required by section 4, chapter 3, Laws of 2012 2nd sp. sess. that was sent by school districts and their benefits providers to the office of the insurance commissioner for plan years ending in 2012 through 2016 for the purposes of studying health benefits provided to school employees must be provided to the authority by March 15, 2018.

(2) All claims data, including health care and financial related data received by the authority under subsection (1) of this section, is the property of the state and is exempt from disclosure and not subject to chapter 42.56 RCW.

[ 2018 c 260 s 31.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2018 c 260 ss 14, 22, 23, 31, and 32: See note following RCW 41.05.075.